Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ENHANCED SUPPORTS TO EMPLOYERS OF
PERSONAL SUPPORT WORKERS
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Enhanced supports to employers of personal support workers”  means support given
to an individual in  self-directing the individual’s services or in managing personal support
workers who are providing in-home services and supports to the individual, using a person-
centered approach  to ensure that the individual is at the center of the decision-making
process regarding what services are needed, including by providing:
(A) Training, coaching and other forms of support to the individual on:
(i) Self-direction; and
(ii) The roles and responsibilities of the individual and the personal support worker;
(B) Training, coaching and other forms of support  to the individual in the overall man-
agement of personal support workers providing personal support services to  the individual,
including in the recruitment, hiring, scheduling and  training of personal support workers,
performance assessments of personal support workers and dismissal of personal support
workers; and
(C) Other administrative and employment-related supports.
(b) “Individual” means a child or adult with an  intellectual or developmental disability,
or the representative  of the child or adult, who receives in-home services and supports
through the Department of Human Services.
(2) The department shall contract with one or  more organizations to provide enhanced
supports to employers of personal support workers.
(3) An organization contracting with the department under subsection (2) of this  section
shall be expected, at a minimum, to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1521 (SB 1521-B) Page 1
(a) Maximize an individual’s self-direction and autonomy by supporting the individual to
direct the individual’s personal  support workers and manage the day-to-day services of the
individual’s personal support workers;
(b) Have  a commitment to work with a broad coalition of stakeholders in an effort to
understand the changing needs of the workforce and of individuals’ needs, rights and pref-
erences; and
(c) Have the ability to meet the state’s interest in  preventing or mitigating disruptions
to individuals’ in-home services and supports.
(4) The department may not contract with an organization under subsection (2) of  this
section to provide enhanced supports to employers of personal support  workers if the owner
or an executive officer of the organization has been  convicted of Medicaid fraud in any state
within the 25-year period prior to entering into the contract.
SECTION 2.
The Department of Human Services shall contract with  at least one organ-
ization to provide enhanced supports to employers of personal  support workers, as defined
in section 1 of this 2024 Act, no later than July 1, 2024.
AGENCY WITH CHOICE SERVICES
SECTION 3.  ORS 427.181 is amended to read:
427.181. (1) As used in this section  and section 5 of this 2024 Act :
(a) “Agency with choice services” means support given to an individual in self-directing the
individual’s services or in managing staff who are providing in-home services and  supports to the
individual, using a person-centered approach to ensure that the  individual is at the center of the
decision-making process regarding what services are needed, including by providing:
(A) Training, coaching and other forms of support to the individual on:
(i) Self-direction; and
(ii) The roles and responsibilities of the individual and  the agency with choice services provider;
(B) Training,  coaching and other forms of support to the individual in the overall management
of staff providing direct support services to the individual, including in the  recruitment, hiring,
scheduling and training of staff, performance assessments of staff and dismissal of staff; and
(C) Other administrative and employment-related supports.
(b) “Individual” means  a child or adult with an intellectual or developmental disability[ , or the
representative of the child or adult, ] who receives in-home services and  supports through the De-
partment of Human Services.
(2) The department shall contract with  one or more endorsed organizations to deliver agency
with choice services as a community-based services option under ORS 427.007 (1)(d).
[(3) An organization contracting with the department under subsection (2) of this section shall  be
expected, at a minimum, to: ]
[(a) Maximize an individual’s self-direction and autonomy by supporting  the individual to direct
the individual’s staff hired  to provide direct support services to the individual and manage the day-to-
day services of the individual’s staff hired to provide direct support services to the individual; ]
[(b) Have a commitment to work with a broad coalition of stakeholders  in an effort to understand
the changing needs of the workforce and of individuals’ needs, rights and preferences; and ]
[(c) Have the ability to meet  the state’s interest in preventing or mitigating disruptions to
individuals’ in-home services and supports. ]
[(4) The department  may not contract with an organization under subsection (2) of this section to
provide agency with choice  services if the owner of or an executive officer of the organization has been
convicted of Medicaid fraud in any state within the 25-year period prior to entering into the contract. ]
(3) The department  shall adopt by rule minimum qualifications for agencies to be en-
dorsed by the department to deliver agency with choice services.
(4) Minimum qualifications for agencies endorsed to deliver  agency with choice services
include, but are not limited to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1521 (SB 1521-B) Page 2
(a) The ability to provide support for individuals in directing the individual’s direct sup-
port worker and the day-to-day services of the direct support worker;
(b) A commitment to work with a broad coalition of stakeholders in an effort to  under-
stand the changing needs of the workforce and of individuals’ needs, rights and  preferences;
and
(c) The ability to meet the  state’s interest in preventing or mitigating disruptions to
individuals’ in-home services and supports.
(5) The department may not endorse an agency  to provide agency with choice services
if the owner of the agency or an executive officer of the agency has been convicted  of
Medicaid fraud in any state within the 25-year period prior to the certification.
(6) For the purpose of  monitoring and evaluating workforce capacity and trends, an
agency endorsed to provide agency with choice services must annually provide to the  de-
partment in the manner and at intervals specified by the department by rule:
(a) A list  of direct support workers for which the agency billed the department for ser-
vices provided through the agency with choice model;
(b) The zip codes where the direct support workers provided services; and
(c) Verification of the completion of training required for each direct support worker.
SECTION 4.
 Section 2, chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The Department of Human Services shall contract with [ an] at  least one  organization
to deliver agency with  choice services under [ section 1, chapter 91, Oregon Laws 2022, ] ORS 427.181
no later than [ July 1, 2024 ] January 1, 2026 .
AGENCIES THAT EMPLOY DIRECT SUPPORT WORKERS
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Assessed hours” means the number of hours of direct support services that  the
Department of Human Services determines is needed by an individual in a month.
(b) “Client” means an individual who enrolls with an agency  that provides direct support
services to the individual.
(2) An agency that employs staff to provide direct support services may not:
(a) Offer bonus prizes or other  forms of consideration to a potential client in exchange
for the client enrolling with the agency;
(b) Offer bonus payments, prizes, wage enhancements  or other forms of consideration to
direct support staff in exchange for the direct support staff agreeing to work for the  agency;
(c) Require a client to commit the majority of the  client’s assessed hours to the agency
as a condition of enrollment;
(d) Limit  services only to individuals who agree to bring the individual’s direct support
staff to the agency;
(e) Require direct support staff, as a condition of employment  with the agency, to bring
to the agency the individuals to whom the direct support staff provide services;
(f) Enroll only clients who receive direct support services exclusively from family mem-
bers or close associates of the client; or
(g) Facilitate financial exploitation by engaging in targeted  communications that en-
courage a health care provider to steer a client to the agency.
(3) It is  solely the choice of an individual to select an agency to provide direct support
services.
PROGRAM INTEGRITY UNIT
SECTION 6.
The Oregon Health Authority shall hire for one position  in the authority’s
unit that is responsible for Medicaid program integrity  and taking enforcement actions, in
addition to the positions in the unit on the effective date of this 2024 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1521 (SB 1521-B) Page 3
USE OF ACUITY-BASED STAFFING TOOL BY FACILITIES
SECTION 7.  ORS 443.889 is amended to read:
443.889. (1) The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules:
(a) Establishing minimum  requirements for an acuity-based staffing tool adopted by a facility and
the frequency with which a  facility must reassess the facility’s staffing patterns with the acuity-
based staffing tool.
(b) Establishing requirements for the design of an acuity-based staffing  tool adopted by a facility
to ensure that the tool recommends staffing levels,  intensity and qualifications necessary to meet
the scheduled and unscheduled needs of all residents 24 hours a day, seven days a week.
(c) For carrying out subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section.
(2) Before finalizing  any changes to rules adopted under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
section, to promote quality care or sufficient staffing levels the department shall  assess the
administrative and operational impact on facilities and on the safety  of the residents and
staff of facilities.
[(2)] (3)  The department shall assess the staffing levels of a facility, at a minimum, each time
the department conducts a survey, license approval or renewal or an  investigation into a complaint
regarding:
(a) Abuse of a resident;
(b) Injury to a resident;
(c) Resident safety; or
(d) Staffing levels.
[(3)] (4)  The assessment under  subsection [ (2)] (3)  of this section must include a determination
of whether the facility is:
(a) Using an acuity-based staffing tool that  meets the requirements of rules adopted under sub-
section (1) of this section;
(b) Recalculating the facility’s staffing patterns  using the acuity-based staffing tool with the
frequency required by rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section;
(c) Consistently staffing to the levels, intensity  and qualifications indicated by the acuity-based
staffing tool; and
(d) Consistently meeting the scheduled and unscheduled needs of all  residents 24 hours a day,
seven days a week.
[(4)] (5) If the department finds, during an assessment  under subsection [ (2)] (3)  of this section,
that a facility is:
(a) Not using an acuity-based staffing tool, the department shall require the facility to  adopt the
acuity-based staffing tool developed by the department  until the facility has in  place the facility’s
own acuity-based staffing tool .
(b) Using an acuity-based staffing tool but is not meeting the scheduled and unscheduled
needs of all residents 24 hours a day, seven days a week, the department shall:
(A) Place a condition on the facility’s license as provided in ORS 441.736  (1)(b)(A), (B), (C) or (F)
[until the facility implements an acuity-based staffing tool and meets the  minimum staffing levels iden-
tified by the department as necessary to  meet the scheduled and unscheduled needs of all residents 24
hours a day, seven days a week; and ];
(B) Establish staffing levels in a corrective action plan;
[(B)] (C)  Impose fines, penalties or conditions required by law or that  the department deems
necessary to compel compliance ; and
(D) Continuously monitor the facility for compliance with  the staffing levels indicated by
the acuity-based staffing tool for six months  or until the department removes the condition
placed under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph .
(c) Using an acuity-based staffing tool but [ is not consistently staffing to  the levels, intensity and
qualifications indicated by the  tool or is not recalculating the facility’s staffing patterns with the tool
at the frequency required by rule ] the tool does not meet the requirements  of the rules adopted
Enrolled Senate Bill 1521 (SB 1521-B) Page 4
under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section or the facility is not using the tool to review
its staffing levels at the frequency required by the rules , the department shall:
(A) Assess whether the facility is meeting the scheduled and unscheduled needs of all  residents
24 hours a day, seven days a week;  and
(B) [ Place a condition  on the facility’s license as provided in ORS 441.736 (1)(b)(A), (B), (C) or (F)
until the facility implements an acuity-based  staffing tool and demonstrates the facility’s ability to meet
the scheduled and unscheduled needs of all residents 24 hours a day, seven days a week; and ] Impose
fines, penalties or conditions on the facility’s license that are required by law or that  the
department deems necessary to compel compliance.
[(C) Continuously monitor the facility, for at least six months, for compliance with the staffing
levels, intensity and qualifications indicated by the acuity-based staffing tool. ]
[(d) Not  meeting the scheduled and unscheduled needs of all residents 24 hours a day, seven days
a week, the department  shall establish staffing standards in a corrective action plan and place a con-
dition on  the facility’s license as provided in ORS 441.736 (1)(b)(A), (B), (C) or (F) until the facility
complies with the corrective action plan. ]
AUTOMATIC SPRINKLER SYSTEMS
SECTION 8.
 Section 3, chapter 91, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding any provision of the state building code, as defined in ORS 455.010,  a
single-family detached dwelling  that is used to operate a residential training home, as defined in
ORS 443.400, or an adult foster home, as defined in ORS 443.705, is  not required to have installed
an automatic sprinkler system if:
(1) The dwelling has been operated as  a residential training home or an adult foster home pur-
suant to a license issued prior to July 1, [ 2024] 2026;
(2) The operator is licensed to serve five or fewer individuals in the dwelling; and
(3) The operator  and the dwelling meet all other fire, life and safety requirements established
by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority by rule.
SECTION 9.
 Section 9, chapter 91, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  [(1)] Section 3 , chapter 91, Oregon Laws 2022,  [of this  2022 Act ] is repealed on January
2, [2026] 2027.
[(2) Sections 4, 5 and 6 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2023. ]
APPROPRIATIONS AND EXPENDITURE LIMITATIONS
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,
is increased by $78,216 for carrying out the provisions of sections  1 and 2 of this 2024 Act and
the amendments to ORS 427.181 and 443.889  and section 2, chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2023,
by sections 3, 4 and 7 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon  Laws 2023, collected
or received by the Department of Human Services, for  intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $78,216 for carrying out the provisions of sections 1 and 2 of this
2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 427.181 and 443.889 and section 2, chapter  568, Oregon
Laws 2023, by sections 3, 4 and 7 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide  costs, is
Enrolled Senate Bill 1521 (SB 1521-B) Page 5
increased by $8,331 for carrying out  the provisions of sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act and
the amendments to ORS 427.181 and 443.889 and section  2, chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2023,
by sections 3, 4 and 7 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon  Laws 2023, collected
or received by the  Department of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $8,331 for carrying out  the provisions of sections 1 and 2 of this 2024
Act and the amendments to ORS 427.181 and 443.889 and section 2, chapter 568, Oregon Laws
2023, by sections 3, 4 and 7 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 14.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for central services, is increased by $888 for  carrying
out the provisions of sections 1 and 2 of this  2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 427.181
and 443.889 and section 2, chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2023, by  sections 3, 4 and 7 of this 2024
Act.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds not  described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the Department of Human Services, for central services, is  increased by $888
for carrying out the provisions  of sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to
ORS 427.181 and 443.889 and section 2, chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2023, by sections 3, 4  and 7
of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 16.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division -Administration, is increased
by $62,208, for carrying out the provisions of section 6 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Services  Division - Administration, is
increased by $62,208, for carrying out the provisions of section 6 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,  is in-
creased by $3,516, for carrying out the provisions of section 6 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $3,516, for carrying out the provisions of section 6 of this 2024 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 20. The unit captions  used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1521 (SB 1521-B) Page 6
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 21. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1521 (SB 1521-B) Page 7